Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2637.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Artificial Intelligence Chatbots in Children's Toys Temporary Prohibition Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Artificial intelligence." Any of the following:(1) A machine-based system that can, for a given set of human-defined objectives, make predictions, recommendations or decisions influencing real or virtual environments, including the ability to:1234567891011121314151617 (i) perceive real and virtual environments;(ii) abstract perceptions into models through analysis in an automated manner; and(iii) use model inference to formulate options for information or action based on the outcomes under subparagraphs (i) and (ii).(2) The term includes generative artificial intelligence."Artificial intelligence chatbot" or "AI chatbot." Artificial intelligence technology that uses generative artificial intelligence to simulate or engage in an interactive conversation with a user. The term does not include artificial intelligence technology that provides only scripted, prewritten or predetermined output."Children's toy." A product designed, manufactured, marketed or intended for use as a plaything by a child under 14 years of age."Generative artificial intelligence." A class of models that emulate the structure and characteristics of input data in order to generate derived synthetic content, including an image, video, audio clip or text, that is significantly modified or generated by algorithms, including by artificial intelligence."Unfair Trade Practices and Consumer Protection Law." The act of December 17, 1968 (P.L.1224, No.387), known as the Unfair Trade Practices and Consumer Protection Law.Section 3. Temporary prohibition.(a) Prohibition.--A person may not manufacture, distribute, sell, lease, offer for sale or offer for lease in this Commonwealth a children's toy that incorporates an AI chatbot.(b) Applicability.--This section shall not apply three years 20260HB2637PN3607 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 after the effective date of this subsection.(c) Notice.--The Attorney General shall transmit notice to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin of the date on which this section no longer applies under subsection (b).(d) Prior violations.--Subsection (b) shall not affect the authority of the Attorney General to enforce a violation of subsection (a) that occurs before the date on which this section no longer applies.Section 4. Enforcement.(a) Unlawful act or practice.--A violation of section 3 shall be deemed an unfair method of competition and an unfair or deceptive act or practice in the conduct of trade or commerce under section 3 of the Unfair Trade Practices and Consumer Protection Law.(b) Enforcement.--The Attorney General may bring an action in the name of the Commonwealth under section 4 of the Unfair Trade Practices and Consumer Protection Law to restrain a violation of section 3 by temporary or permanent injunction.(c) Restitution and costs.--In an action under subsection (b), the Attorney General may seek payment of costs and restitution under section 4.1 of the Unfair Trade Practices and Consumer Protection Law.(d) Civil penalties.--In an action under subsection (b), the Attorney General may recover a civil penalty under section 8 of the Unfair Trade Practices and Consumer Protection Law.(e) Construction.--The remedies under this section are cumulative and shall not be construed to limit any other remedy available under law.Section 5. Effective date.20260HB2637PN3607 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 This act shall take effect immediately.20260HB2637PN3607 - 4 - 1